North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-35.3 Financial Institutions Taxation [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17]

57-35.3-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-02.
Taxable income. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-03.
Imposition and basis of tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-04.
Lieu tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-05.
Credits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-06.
Tax return. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-07.
Payment of tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-08.
Disposition of tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-09.
Financial institution tax distribution fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-10.
Certification of estimated tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-11.
Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-12.
Applicable provisions of chapter 57-38 relating to administration, interest, and penalties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-13.
Apportionment and allocation — General. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-14.
Apportionment and allocation — Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-15.
Apportionment and allocation — Receipts factor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-16.
Apportionment and allocation — Property factor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.

57-35.3-17.
Apportionment and allocation — Payroll factor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 449, § 17.